Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 13.60.010 and 2022 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The Washington state patrol shall establish a missing children and endangered person clearinghouse which shall include the maintenance and operation of a toll-free telephone hotline. The clearinghouse shall distribute information to local law enforcement agencies, school districts, the department of children, youth, and families, and the general public regarding missing children and endangered persons. The information shall include pictures, bulletins, training sessions, reports, and biographical materials that will assist in local law enforcement efforts to locate missing children and endangered persons. The state patrol shall also maintain a regularly updated computerized link with national and other statewide missing person systems or clearinghouses, and, within existing resources, shall develop and implement a plan, commonly known as an "amber alert plan" which includes the "amber alert" designation; or an "endangered missing person advisory plan" which includes "endangered person alert," "silver alert," and "missing indigenous person alert" designations; for ((voluntary))mandatory cooperation ((between))by local, state, tribal, and other law enforcement agencies((,))and state government agencies((,)); and voluntary cooperation by radio and television stations, cable and satellite systems, and social media pages and sites to enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering abducted children and missing endangered persons consistent with the state endangered missing person advisory plan.(2) For the purposes of this chapter:(a) "Amber alert" means the designated title of a missing child advisory that will be used on a variable message sign and text of the highway advisory radio message when used as part of an activated advisory to assist in the recovery of a missing child who meets the following criteria:(i) Is known or reasonably suspected to have been abducted, or has gone missing under unexplained or suspicious circumstances;(ii) As a result of the circumstances in (a)(i) of this subsection, is believed to be in imminent danger of death, serious bodily injury, or trafficking;(iii) There is enough descriptive information available to believe that an amber alert will assist in the recovery of the child; and(iv) The incident must be reported to and investigated by a law enforcement agency, and the child, suspect, and vehicle information are entered into the national crime information center if sufficient information is available.(b) "Child" or "children" means an individual under 18 years of age.(((b)))(c) "Endangered person alert" means the designated title of a missing endangered person advisory that will be used on a variable message sign and text of the highway advisory radio message when used as part of an activated advisory to assist in the recovery of a missing endangered person who does not meet the criteria of (e) or (f) of this subsection.(d) "Missing endangered person" means:(i) A missing indigenous woman or indigenous person; ((or))(ii) A person who is believed to be in danger because of age, health, mental or physical disability, in combination with environmental or weather conditions, or is believed to be unable to return to safety without assistance and who is:(A) A person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020(((5)));(B) A vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020; or(C) A person who has been diagnosed as having Alzheimer's disease or other age-related dementia; or(iii) A missing person who may be a victim of trafficking as defined in RCW 9A.40.100.(((c)))(e) "Missing indigenous person alert" means the designated title of a missing endangered person advisory that will be used on a variable message sign and text of the highway advisory radio message when used as part of an activated advisory to assist in the recovery of a missing indigenous person.(((d)))(f) "Silver alert" means the designated title of a missing endangered person advisory that will be used on a variable message sign and text of the highway advisory radio message when used as part of an activated advisory to assist in the recovery of a missing endangered person age 60 or older.Sec. 2. RCW 13.60.050 and 2009 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Within existing resources, the Washington state patrol shall develop and implement a plan, commonly known as an "endangered missing person advisory plan," for ((voluntary))mandatory cooperation ((between))by local, state, tribal, and other law enforcement agencies((,))and state government agencies((,)); and voluntary cooperation by radio and television stations((,)) and cable and satellite systems to enhance the public's ability to assist in recovering endangered missing persons who do not qualify for inclusion in an amber alert.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 13.60 RCW to read as follows:By March 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the Washington state patrol must prepare and submit an annual report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature. The report must cover the prior calendar year and include, at a minimum, the following information:(1) The number of missing persons alert activations and the number of children involved;(2) Outcomes, including the number of individuals recovered safe, recovered deceased, or still missing, and the number of recoveries attributable to missing persons alerts;(3) The average and median times from initial report to alert issuance, and from alert issuance to recovery, if available;(4) The number of activations that were canceled or later determined to be unfounded;(5) The number of cross-jurisdictional activations and activations involving tribal jurisdictions;(6) Staffing, training, and budget information specific to missing persons alert coordination;(7) A summary of public outreach activities and technology used, including the emergency alert system and social media;(8) Two case summaries demonstrating missing persons alerts system performance, provided that personal identifying information and confidential information is redacted, including:(a) One case summary illustrating a successful outcome; and(b) One case summary illustrating a significant challenge; and(9) Recommendations for legislative or administrative action, if necessary, including any estimated costs.This section expires March 31, 2030.--- END ---